Vermont, session 2025-2026, H340.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 118 is added to read:
CHAPTER 118. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
Subchapter 1. Algorithmic Discrimination and Automated Decision Systems
§ 4193a. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 2 of 23
(1)(A) “Algorithmic discrimination” means any condition in which the
use of an automated decision system results in a differential treatment or
impact that disfavors an individual on the basis of the individual’s actual or
perceived age, color, disability, ethnicity, genetic information, immigration or
citizenship status, limited proficiency in the English language, national origin,
race, religion, reproductive health, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
veteran status, or other classification protected under the laws of this State or
federal law.
(B) “Algorithmic discrimination” does not include:
(i) a developer’s or deployer’s testing of the developer’s or
deployer’s own automated decision system to identify, mitigate, and prevent
discrimination;
(ii) expanding an applicant, customer, or participant pool to
increase diversity or redress historical discrimination; or
(iii) an act or omission by or on behalf of a private club or other
establishment that is not in fact open to the public, as set forth in Title II of the
federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C.§ 2000a(e), as amended.
(2) “Auditor” refers to an independent entity, including an individual, a
nonprofit, a firm, a corporation, a partnership, a cooperative, or an association,
commissioned to perform an audit.
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 3 of 23
(3)(A) “Automated decision system” means a computational process
derived from machine learning, statistical modeling, data analytics, or artificial
intelligence that issues an output, including a score, classification, or
recommendation.
(B) “Automated decision system” does not include any software used
primarily for basic computerized processes, such as antimalware, antivirus,
autocorrect functions, calculators, databases, data storage, electronic
communications, firewall, internet domain registration, website loading,
networking, spam and robocall filtering, spellcheck tools, spreadsheets, web
caching, web hosting, or any tool that relates only to nonemployment internal
management affairs such as ordering office supplies or processing payments,
and that do not materially affect the rights, liberties, benefits, safety, or welfare
of any individual within the State.
(4) “Consequential decision” means a decision that has a material, legal,
or similarly significant effect on the provision or denial to any consumer of, or
the cost, terms, or availability of:
(A) educational and vocational training, including:
(i) assessment or grading, including detecting student cheating or
plagiarism;
(ii) accreditation;
(iii) certification;
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 4 of 23
(iv) admissions or enrollment; and
(v) financial aid or scholarships;
(B) employment or an employment opportunity, including:
(i) pay or promotion;
(ii) hiring or termination; and
(iii) automated task allocation;
(C) housing or lodging, including long-term or short-term rentals;
(D) essential utilities, including electricity, heat, water, internet or
telecommunications access, or transportation;
(E) family planning, including adoption services or reproductive
services, as well as assessments related to child protection services;
(F) health care or health insurance, including mental health care,
dental, or vision;
(G) financial services, including a financial service provided by a
mortgage company, mortgage broker, or creditor;
(H) law enforcement activities, including the allocation of law
enforcement personnel or assets, the enforcement of laws, maintaining public
order, or managing public safety;
(I) government services, including the determination, allocation, or
denial of public benefits and services; and
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 5 of 23
(J) a reasonable accommodation or other right granted under the civil
rights laws of this State.
(5) “Consumer” means an individual who is a resident of the State.
(6) “Deployer” means a person doing business in this State that uses an
automated decision system in a consequential decision in the State or provides
an automated decision system for use in a consequential decision by the
general public in the State. A developer shall also be considered a deployer if
its actions satisfy this definition.
(7) “Deployer-employer” means a deployer that is an employer.
(8) “Developer” means a person doing business in this State that
designs, codes, or produces an automated decision system for use in a
consequential decision or creates a substantial change with respect to an
automated decision system for use in a consequential decision, whether for its
own use in the State or for use by a third party in the State.
(9) “Developer-employer” means a developer that is an employer.
(10) “Employee” means an individual who performs services for and
under the control and direction of an employer for wages or other
remuneration, including former employees, or natural persons employed as
independent contractors to carry out work in furtherance of an employer’s
business enterprise who are not themselves employers.
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 6 of 23
(11) “Employer” means any person, firm, partnership, institution,
corporation, or association that employs one or more employees.
(12) “Software stack” means the group of individual software
components that work together to support the execution of an automated
decision system.
(13) “Substantial change” means any:
(A) deliberate change to an automated decision system that would
result in material inaccuracies in the reports created under section 4193f of this
title; or
(B) substantial change in the data that the automated decision system
uses as input or training data.
§ 4193b. ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION
It shall be unlawful discrimination for a developer or deployer to use, sell,
or share an automated decision system for use in a consequential decision or a
product featuring an automated decision system for use in a consequential
decision that produces algorithmic discrimination.
§ 4193c. DEPLOYER AND DEVELOPER OBLIGATIONS
(a) Any deployer that employs an automated decision system for a
consequential decision shall inform the consumer prior to the use of the system
for a consequential decision in clear, conspicuous, and consumer-friendly
terms, made available in each of the languages in which the company offers its
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 7 of 23
end services, that automated decision systems will be used to make a
consequential decision or to assist in making a consequential decision.
(b) Any notice provided by a deployer to the consumer pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section shall include:
(1) a description of the personal characteristics or attributes that the
system will measure or assess;
(2) the method by which the system measures or assesses those
attributes or characteristics;
(3) how those attributes or characteristics are relevant to the
consequential decisions for which the system should be used;
(4) any human components of the system;
(5) how any automated components of the system are used to inform the
consequential decision; and
(6) a direct link to a publicly accessible page on the deployer’s website
that contains a plain-language description of the:
(A) system’s outputs;
(B) types and sources of data collected from natural persons and
processed by the system when it is used to make, or assists in making, a
consequential decision; and
(C) results of the most recent impact assessment, or an active link to
a web page where a consumer can review those results.
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 8 of 23
(c) Any deployer that employs an automated decision system for a
consequential decision shall provide the consumer with a single notice
containing a plain-language explanation of the decision that identifies the
principal reason or reasons for the consequential decision, including:
(1) the identity of the developer of the automated decision system used
in the consequential decision, if the deployer is not also the developer;
(2) a description of what the output of the automated decision system is,
such as a score, recommendation, or other similar description;
(3) the degree and manner to which the automated decision system
contributed to the decision;
(4) the types and sources of data processed by the automated decision
system in making the consequential decision;
(5) a plain language explanation of how the consumer’s personal data
informed the consequential decision; and
(6) what actions, if any, the consumer might have taken to secure a
different decision and the actions that the consumer might take to secure a
different decision in the future.
(d)(1) A deployer shall provide and explain a process for a consumer to
appeal a decision, which shall at minimum allow the consumer to:
(A) formally contest the decision;
(B) provide information to support their position; and
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 9 of 23
(C) obtain meaningful human review of the decision.
(2) For an appeal made pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection:
(A) a deployer shall designate a human reviewer who:
(i) is trained and qualified to understand the consequential
decision being appealed, the consequences of the decision for the consumer,
how to evaluate and how to serve impartially, including by avoiding
prejudgment of the facts at issue, conflict of interest, and bias;
(ii) does not have a conflict of interest for or against the deployer
or the consumer;
(iii) was not involved in the initial decision being appealed;
(iv) shall enjoy protection from dismissal or its equivalent,
disciplinary measures, or other adverse treatment for exercising their functions
under this section; and
(v) shall be allocated sufficient human resources by the deployer
to conduct an effective appeal of the decision; and
(B) the human reviewer shall consider the information provided by
the consumer in their appeal and may consider other sources of information
relevant to the consequential decision.
(3) A deployer shall respond to a consumer’s appeal not later than 45
after receipt of the appeal. That period may be extended once by an additional
45 days where reasonably necessary, taking into account the complexity and
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 10 of 23
number of appeals. The deployer shall inform the consumer of any extension
not later than 45 days after receipt of the appeal, together with the reasons for
the delay.
(e) The deployer or developer of an automated decision system is legally
responsible for the quality and accuracy of all consequential decisions made,
including any bias or algorithmic discrimination resulting from the operation
of the automated decision system.
(f) A developer shall not use, sell, or share an automated decision system
for use in a consequential decision or a product featuring an automated
decision system for use in a consequential decision that has not passed an
independent audit, in accordance with section 4193e of this title. If an
independent audit finds that an automated decision system for use in a
consequential decision does produce algorithmic discrimination, the developer
shall not use, sell, or share the system until the algorithmic discrimination has
been proven to be rectified by a post-adjustment audit.
(g) Except as provided in subsection 4193e(a) of this title, the rights and
obligations under this section may not be waived by any person, partnership,
association, or corporation.
§ 4193d. WHISTLEBLOWER PROTECTIONS
(a) Developer-employers and deployer-employers of automated decision
systems used in consequential decisions shall not:
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 11 of 23
(1) prevent an employee from disclosing information to the Attorney
General, including through terms and conditions of employment or seeking
to enforce terms and conditions of employment, if the employee has reasonable
cause to believe the information indicates a violation of this subchapter; or
(2) retaliate against an employee for disclosing information to the
Attorney General pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(b) Developer-employers and deployer-employers of automated decision
systems used in consequential decisions shall provide a clear notice to all
employees working on automated decision systems of their rights and
responsibilities under this subchapter, including the right of employees of
contractors and subcontractors to use the developer’s internal process for
making protected disclosures pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. A
developer-employer or deployer-employer is presumed to be in compliance
with the requirements of this subsection if the developer-employer or deployer-
employer does either of the following:
(1) at all times:
(A) posts and displays within all workplaces maintained by
the developer-employer or deployer-employer a notice to all employees of
their rights and responsibilities under this subchapter;
(B) ensures that all new employees receive equivalent notice; and
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 12 of 23
(C) ensures that employees who work remotely periodically receive
an equivalent notice; or
(2) not less frequently than once every year, provides written notice
to all employees of their rights and responsibilities under this subchapter and
ensures that the notice is received and acknowledged by all of those
employees.
(c) Each developer-employer shall provide a reasonable internal process
through which an employee may anonymously disclose information to the
developer if the employee believes in good faith that the information indicates
that the developer has violated any provision of this subchapter or any other
law, or has made false or materially misleading statements related to its safety
and security protocol, or failed to disclose known risks to employees,
including, at a minimum, a monthly update to the person who made the
disclosure regarding the status of the developer’s investigation of the
disclosure and the actions taken by the developer in response to the disclosure.
§ 4193e. AUDITS
(a) Prior to deployment of an automated decision system for use in a
consequential decision, six months after deployment, and at least every 18
months thereafter for each calendar year an automated decision system is in
use in consequential decisions after the first post-deployment audit, the
developer and deployer shall be jointly responsible for ensuring that an
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 13 of 23
independent audit is conducted in compliance with the provisions of this
section to ensure that the product does not produce algorithmic discrimination
and complies with the provisions of this subchapter. The developer and
deployer shall enter into a contract specifying which party is responsible for
the costs, oversight, and results of the audit. Absent an agreement of
responsibility through contract, the developer and deployer shall be jointly and
severally liable for any violations of this section. Regardless of final findings,
the deployer or developer shall deliver all audits conducted under this section
to the Attorney General.
(b) A deployer or developer may contract with more than one auditor to
fulfill the requirements of this section.
(c) The audit shall include the following:
(1) an analysis of data management policies, including whether personal
or sensitive data relating to a consumer is subject to data security protection
standards that comply with the requirements of applicable State law;
(2) an analysis of the system validity and reliability according to each
specified use case listed in the entity’s reporting document filed by the
developer or deployer pursuant to section 4193f of this title;
(3) a comparative analysis of the system’s performance when used on
consumers of different demographic groups and a determination of whether the
system produces algorithmic discrimination in violation of this subchapter by
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 14 of 23
each intended and foreseeable identified use as identified by the deployer and
developer pursuant to section 4193f of this title;
(4) an analysis of how the technology complies with existing relevant
federal, State, and local labor, civil rights, consumer protection, privacy, and
data privacy laws; and
(5) an evaluation of the developer’s or deployer’s documented risk
management policy and program as set forth in section 4193g of this title for
conformity with subsection 4193g(a) of this title.
(d) The Attorney General may adopt further rules as necessary to ensure
that audits under this section assess whether or not automated decision systems
used in consequential decisions produce algorithmic discrimination and
otherwise comply with the provisions of this subchapter.
(e) The independent auditor shall have complete and unredacted copies of
all reports previously filed by the deployer or developer pursuant to section
4193f of this title.
(f) An audit conducted under this section shall be completed in its entirety
without the assistance of an automated decision system.
(g)(1) An auditor shall be an independent entity, including an individual,
nonprofit, firm, corporation, partnership, cooperative, or association.
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 15 of 23
(2) For the purposes of this subchapter, no auditor may be
commissioned by a developer or deployer of an automated decision system
used in consequential decisions if the auditor:
(A) has already been commissioned to provide any auditing or
nonauditing service, including financial auditing, cybersecurity auditing, or
consulting services of any type, to the commissioning company in the past 12
months;
(B) is or was involved in using, developing, integrating, offering,
licensing, or deploying the automated decision system;
(C) has or had an employment relationship with a developer or
deployer that uses, offers, or licenses the automated decision system; or
(D) has or had a direct financial interest or a material indirect
financial interest in a developer or deployer that uses, offers, or licenses the
automated decision system.
(3) Fees paid to auditors may not be contingent on the result of the audit
and the commissioning company shall not provide any incentives or bonuses
for a positive audit result.
(h) The Attorney General may adopt rules to ensure:
(1) the independence of auditors under this section;
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 16 of 23
(2) that teams conducting audits incorporate feedback from communities
that may foreseeably be the subject of algorithmic discrimination with respect
to the automated decision system being audited; and
(3) that the requirements of an audit as set forth in subsection (c) of this
section are updated to reflect responsible evaluation practices and include
adequate information to enforce this subchapter.
§ 4193f. AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM REPORTING
REQUIREMENTS
(a) Every developer and deployer of an automated decision system used in
a consequential decision shall comply with the reporting requirements of this
section. Regardless of final findings, reports shall be filed with the Attorney
General prior to deployment of an automated decision system used in a
consequential decision and then annually, or after each substantial change to
the system, whichever comes first.
(b) Together with each report required to be filed under this section,
developers and deployers shall file with the Attorney General a copy of the last
completed independent audit required by this subchapter and a legal attestation
that the automated decision system used in a consequential decision:
(1) does not violate any provision of this subchapter; or
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 17 of 23
(2) may violate or does violate one or more provisions of this article,
that there is a plan of remediation to bring the automated decision system into
compliance with this subchapter, and a summary of the plan of remediation.
(c) Developers of automated decision systems shall file with the Attorney
General a report containing the following:
(1) a description of the system including:
(A) a description of the system’s software stack;
(B) the purpose of the system and its expected benefits; and
(C) the system’s current and intended uses, including what
consequential decisions it will support and what stakeholders will be impacted;
(2) the intended outputs of the system and whether the outputs can be or
are otherwise appropriate to be used for any purpose not previously articulated;
(3) the methods for training of their models including:
(A) any pre-processing steps taken to prepare datasets for the training
of a model underlying an automated decision system;
(B) descriptions of the datasets upon which models were trained and
evaluated, how and why datasets were collected and the sources of those
datasets, and how that training data will be used and maintained;
(C) the quality and appropriateness of the data used in the automated
decision system’s design, development, testing, and operation;
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 18 of 23
(D) whether the data contains sufficient breadth to address the range
of real-world inputs the automated decision system might encounter and how
any data gaps have been addressed; and
(E) steps taken to ensure compliance with privacy, data privacy,
data security, and copyright laws;
(4) use and data management policies;
(5) any other information necessary to allow the deployer to understand
the outputs and monitor the system for compliance with this subchapter;
(6) any other information necessary to allow the deployer to comply
with the requirements of subsection (d) of this section;
(7) a description of the system’s capabilities and any developer-imposed
limitations, including capabilities outside of its intended use, when the system
should not be used, any safeguards or guardrails in place to protect against
unintended, inappropriate, or disallowed uses, and testing of any safeguards or
guardrails;
(8) an internal risk assessment including documentation and results of
testing conducted to identify all reasonably foreseeable risks related to
algorithmic discrimination, validity and reliability, privacy and autonomy, and
safety and security, as well as actions taken to address those risks, and
subsequent testing to assess the efficacy of actions taken to address risks; and
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 19 of 23
(9) whether the system should be monitored and, if so, how the system
should be monitored.
(d) Deployers of automated decision systems used in consequential
decisions shall file with the Attorney General a report containing the
following:
(1) a description of the system, including:
(A) a description of the system’s software stack;
(B) the purpose of the system and its expected benefits; and
(C) the system’s current and intended uses, including what
consequential decisions it will support and what stakeholders will be impacted;
(2) the intended outputs of the system and whether the outputs can be
or are otherwise appropriate to be used for any purpose not previously
articulated;
(3) whether the deployer collects revenue or plans to collect revenue
from use of the automated decision system in a consequential decision and, if
so, how it monetizes or plans to monetize use of the system;
(4) whether the system is designed to make consequential decisions
itself or whether and how it supports consequential decisions;
(5) a description of the system’s capabilities and any deployer-imposed
limitations, including capabilities outside of its intended use, when the system
should not be used, any safeguards or guardrails in place to protect against
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 20 of 23
unintended, inappropriate, or disallowed uses, and testing of any safeguards or
guardrails;
(6) an assessment of the relative benefits and costs to the consumer
given the system’s purpose, capabilities, and probable use cases;
(7) an internal risk assessment including documentation and results of
testing conducted to identify all reasonably foreseeable risks related to
algorithmic discrimination, accuracy and reliability, privacy and autonomy,
and safety and security, as well as actions taken to address those risks, and
subsequent testing to assess the efficacy of actions taken to address risks; and
(8) whether the system should be monitored and, if so, how the
system should be monitored.
(e) The Attorney General shall:
(1) adopt rules:
(A) for a process whereby developers and deployers may request
redaction of portions of reports required under this section to ensure that they
are not required to disclose sensitive and protected information; and
(B) to determine reasonably foreseeable risks related to algorithmic
discrimination, validity and reliability, privacy and autonomy, and safety and
security, pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of this section; and
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 21 of 23
(2) maintain an online database that is accessible to the general public
with reports, redacted in accordance with this section, and audits required by
this subchapter, which shall be updated biannually.
(f) For automated decision systems already in deployment for use in
consequential decisions on or before July 1, 2025, developers and deployers
shall not later than 18 months after July 1, 2025 complete and file the reports
and complete the independent audit required by this subchapter.
§ 4193g. RISK MANAGEMENT POLICY AND PROGRAM
(a) Each developer or deployer of automated decision systems used in
consequential decisions shall plan, document, and implement a risk
management policy and program to govern development or deployment, as
applicable, of the automated decision system. The risk management policy and
program shall specify and incorporate the principles, processes, and personnel
that the deployer uses to identify, document, and mitigate known or reasonably
foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination covered under section 4193b of
this title. The risk management policy and program shall be an iterative
process planned, implemented, and regularly and systematically reviewed and
updated over the life cycle of an automated decision system, requiring regular,
systematic review and updates, including updates to documentation. A risk
management policy and program implemented and maintained pursuant to this
subsection shall be reasonable considering the:
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 22 of 23
(1) guidance and standards set forth in version 1.0 of the Artificial
Intelligence Risk Management Framework published by the National Institute
of Standards and Technology in the U.S. Department of Commerce, or the
latest version of the Artificial Intelligence Risk Management Framework
published by the National Institute of Standards and Technology if, in the
Attorney General’s discretion, the latest version of the Artificial Intelligence
Risk Management Framework published by the National Institute of Standards
and Technology in the U.S. Department of Commerce is at least as stringent as
version 1.0;
(2) size and complexity of the developer or deployer;
(3) nature, scope, and intended uses of the automated decision system
developed or deployed for use in consequential decisions; and
(4) sensitivity and volume of data processed in connection with
the automated decision system.
(b) A risk management policy and program implemented pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section may cover multiple automated decision systems
developed by the same developer or deployed by the same deployer for use in
consequential decisions if sufficient.
(c) The Attorney General may require a developer or a deployer to
disclose the risk management policy and program implemented pursuant to
VT LEG #378965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.340
2025 Page 23 of 23
subsection (a) of this section in a form and manner prescribed by the Attorney
General. The Attorney General may evaluate the risk management policy and
program to ensure compliance with this section.
§ 4193h. ENFORCEMENT AND RULEMAKING
(a) A person who violates this subchapter or rules adopted pursuant to this
subchapter commits an unfair and deceptive act in commerce in violation of
section 2453 of this title (Vermont Consumer Protection Act). A consumer
harmed by a violation is eligible to all remedies provided under the Vermont
Consumer Protection Act.
(b) The Attorney General has the same authority to adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this section and to conduct civil investigations,
enter into assurances of discontinuance, bring civil actions, and take other
enforcement actions as provided under chapter 63, subchapter 1 of this title.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378965 v.1